Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2669HV (1) 91 ll/js H.F. 755 Section 1. Section 99G.39, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. a. Two million dollars in lottery 3 revenues shall be transferred each fiscal year to the length 4 of service award program grant fund created in section 100B.52 5 prior to deposit of the lottery revenues in the general fund of 6 the state pursuant to section 99G.40. 7 b. If the length of service award program grant fund is 8 depleted for two consecutive fiscal years, the amount of 9 lottery revenues transferred to the length of service award 10 program grant fund shall increase by five hundred thousand 11 dollars. Moneys in the length of service award program grant 12 fund shall not exceed five million dollars. 13 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 100B.51 Length of service award 14 programs ââ authorization. 15 The governing body of a municipality, as defined in section 16 100B.21, is authorized to establish a length of service award 17 program for volunteer fire fighters as defined in section 18 85.61, emergency medical care providers as defined in section 19 147A.1 who are volunteers, and reserve peace officers as 20 defined in section 80D.1A. The program shall provide length 21 of service awards, as described in section 457(e)(11) of the 22 Internal Revenue Code, to volunteer fire fighters, volunteer 23 emergency medical care providers, and reserve peace officers 24 serving a municipality that elects to establish a program. The 25 program shall be designed to treat awards from the program as 26 a tax-deferred benefit under the Internal Revenue Code. The 27 governing body of the municipality shall, in consultation with 28 the chief or other person in command of the fire department 29 and police department serving the municipality, as applicable, 30 adopt guidelines providing for eligibility requirements for 31 participation by volunteer fire fighters, volunteer emergency 32 medical care providers, and reserve peace officers, minimum 33 vesting requirements, distribution requirements, and such other 34 guidelines as deemed necessary to operate the program. 35 -1- LSB 2669HV (1) 91 ll/js 1/ 4 H.F. 755 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 100B.52 Length of service award 1 program grant fund ââ appropriation. 2 1. A length of service award program grant fund is created 3 in the state treasury under the control of the department of 4 revenue. The fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated to 5 the fund. 6 2. Moneys in the length of service award program grant fund 7 are appropriated to the department of revenue for the purpose 8 of providing grants to municipalities that have established 9 a length of service award program as described in section 10 100B.51 to provide contributions to the program on behalf 11 of participants in the program. The department of revenue 12 shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing a grant 13 application process. The rules must require a municipality to 14 electronically file the grant application with the department 15 of revenue. The grant process shall provide for up to a 16 dollar-for-dollar funding match from a municipality that has 17 established a length of service award program, not to exceed 18 five hundred dollars per person in the program receiving the 19 grant. If the amount in the fund is insufficient to pay all the 20 eligible grants in a fiscal year, the director of revenue shall 21 prorate the moneys awarded to each municipality. The grant 22 process shall allow a municipality to use moneys received to 23 fund the program from gifts, devises, bequests, or any other 24 source for purposes of providing the funding match required by 25 this subsection. 26 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 27 earnings on moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited to 28 the fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys credited to the 29 fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year. 30 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 31 2026. 32